Idaho, session 2026, S1402.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Juvenile Corrections the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
State Juvenile Corrections Center Endowment Income
Fund $45,000 $45,000
II. COMMUNITY, OPERATIONS, AND PROGRAM SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $480,700 $480,700
III. INSTITUTIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $440,200 $440,200
State Juvenile Corrections Center Endowment Income
Fund 0 $220,000 $1,709,800 1,929,800
TOTAL $440,200 $220,000 $1,709,800 $2,370,000
GRANDTOTAL $440,200 $220,000 $1,754,800 $480,700 $2,895,700


SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other appropriation made by law, the
appropriation to the Department of Juvenile Corrections in the Community,
Operations, and Program Services Program is hereby reduced by $327,000 for
trustee and benefit payments from the Miscellaneous Revenue Fund for the
period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Juvenile Corrections is hereby increased by six (6.00)
for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.